Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 25 Public Programs

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1999, ch. 137, § 1, and Laws 1999, ch. 166, § 1, both were originally designated as chapter 25 of title 35. Laws 1999, ch. 166, was subsequently redesignated as chapter 26 of title 35 by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

Repeals and recreations. —

Laws 2003, ch. 99, §§ 1 and 2, repealed and recreated former

35-25-101

through 35-25-110, relating to the Child Health Insurance Program, as present

35-25-101

through

35-25-108

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

45 C.J.S. Insurance § 391.